Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; interchange improvements; U.S. Route 60 and State Route 303 The sum of $5,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to design and conduct an environmental analysis of interchange improvements at U.S. Route 60 and State Route 303.